District of Columbia statutes.
2-303.06a

Repealed

Award of human care procurements.

Repealed.

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 306a
as added Sept. 16, 2000, D.C. Law 13-155, § 2(d), 47 DCR 5035
Apr. 24, 2007, D.C. Law 16-305, § 9, 53 DCR 6198
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185
1981 Ed., § 1-1183.6a.
For temporary (90-day) addition of section, see § 2(d) of the Procurement Practices Human Care Agreement Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-348, June 5, 2000, 47 DCR 5009).